South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S595.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Social Services, relating to Certification of Adoption Investigators and Persons Obtaining Consents or Relinquishments, designated as Regulation Document Number 5303, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The Department of Social Services is responsible for establishing and promulgating rules and regulations for the certification requirements and process for an adoption investigator. The proposed amendments will ensure that prospective investigators have the necessary educational and work experience to further the Department's mission to promote safety, permanency, stability, and well-being of children who need foster care and adoptive placements. The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on June 28, 2024. ----XX----